trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
 Dictionary:
 Sections: 2
 Entries: 24116
 Sdefs: 67
 Paradigms: 428
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzº0123456789</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="aa" />
    <sdef n="acr" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="an" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="atn" />
    <sdef n="cm" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="cnjadv" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="ord" />
    <sdef n="def" />
    <sdef n="dem" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="detnt" />
    <sdef n="enc" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="fts" />
    <sdef n="ger" />
    <sdef n="ifi" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="ind" />
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="itg" />
    <sdef n="loc" />
    <sdef n="lpar" />
    <sdef n="lquest" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="nn" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="percent" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="pis" />
    <sdef n="pl" />
    <sdef n="pos" />
    <sdef n="pp" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="preadv" />
    <sdef n="predet" />
    <sdef n="pri" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="pro" />
    <sdef n="prs" />
    <sdef n="ref" />
    <sdef n="rel" />
    <sdef n="rpar" />
    <sdef n="sent" />
    <sdef n="sg" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="sup" />
    <sdef n="tn" />
    <sdef n="vbhaver" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="vbmod" />
    <sdef n="vbser" />
    <sdef n="web" />
    <sdef n="hour"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
      <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ordinales">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>.º</l>
          <r>.º<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>.ª</l>
          <r>.ª<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>.os</l>
          <r>.os<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>.as</l>
          <r>.as<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
<!--      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re> -->
        <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
      <re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
      <re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?%</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?([ ]?%)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
      <e r="LR">
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="sent"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el__det">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>el</l>
        <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l>
        <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>los</l>
        <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/el_cual__rel">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>cual</l>
        <r>el<b/>cual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>cual</l>
        <r>el<b/>cual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>las<b/>cuales</l>
        <r>el<b/>cual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>cuales</l>
        <r>el<b/>cual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>cual</l>
        <r>el<b/>cual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!--    <pardef n="/el_que__rel">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>que</l>
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>que</l>
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>las<b/>que</l>
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>que</l>
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>que</l>
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 -->
    <pardef n="/el_mío__prn">
      <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>mío</l>
        <r>el<b/>mío<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>mía</l>
        <r>el<b/>mío<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>las<b/>mías</l>
        <r>el<b/>mío<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>míos</l>
        <r>el<b/>mío<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="el cual"><i></i><par n="/el_cual__rel"/></e>
      <e lm="el que"><i></i><par n="/el_que__rel"/></e>
      <e lm="el"><par n="/el__det"/></e>
      <e><par n="ordinales"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="separ"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="emails"/></e>
      <e><par n="urls"/></e>
